epay/epayservices/src/main/resources/com/otextpdf/text/pdf/hyphenation/hyph/sr_Latn.xml
		.inte3r4egn
		.inte3r4esi
		.inte3r4esn
		.inte3r4eso
		.inte3r4esu
		.inte3r4esa
		.inte3r4ese
		.inte3r4eždž
		.inte3r4ije
		.inte2r3je
		.inte3r4ogat
		.juri2s3k
		.juri2s3p
		.nu2z3bel
		.nu2z3bilj
		.nu2z3ljub
		.nu2z3re
		.nu2z3rje
		.nu2z3už
		.nu2s3pos
		.nu2s3pro
		.po2st3egz
		.po2st3indu
		.po2st3lim
		.po2st3onk
		.po2st3oper
		.su2b3a
		.su2b3l
		.su3b4aš
		.su2b3inv
		.su2b3junk
		.su2b3oks
		.su2b3rep
		.su2b3rog
		.su2b3ord
		.supe2r3i
		.supe2r3o
		.supe2r3u
		.supe2r3a
		.supe2r3e
		.supe3r4ior
		.tran2s3a
		.tran2s3c
		.tran2s3e
		.tran2s3k
		.tran2s3l
		.tran2s3m
		.tran2s3n
		.tran2s3o
		.tran2s3p
		.tran2s3t
		.tran2s3u
		.tran2s3v
		.tran2s3nj
		.tran3s4ep
		.tran3s4kri
		.tran3s4um
		.tran3s4ud
		.a2n3jon
		.i2n3jek
		.i2n3jur
		.i2n3just
		.o2d3žal
		.o2d3žalj
		.o2d3ži
		.o2d3žv
		.o2d3že
		.pre2d3ži
		.pre2d3že
		.na2d3ždr
		.na2d3žnj
		.na2d3že
		.na2d3žanj
		.na2d3žir
		.na2d3živ
		.na2d3žup
		l2j
		n2j
		d2ž
		2dž.
	</patterns>

</hyphenation-info>
